Hawaii statutes.
§190-4 Permits. The department of land
and natural resources may, in any conservation district, prohibit the taking of
marine life or the engaging in activities prohibited by this chapter and rules
adopted thereunder, except by permit issued by it for scientific, education, or
other public purposes on such terms and conditions deemed necessary to minimize
any adverse effect within the conservation district; provided that the
department shall provide written notice of any change in permit conditions
ninety calendar days prior to the effective date of the change, except, as
determined by the department, when an immediate change in permit conditions is
necessary to protect or preserve the conservation district. The department may
revoke any permit for any infraction of the terms and conditions of the
permit. Any person whose permit has been revoked shall not be eligible to
apply for another permit until the expiration of one year from the date of
revocation. [L 1955, c 192, §7; RL 1955, §21-136; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §22; am
L 1961, c 132, §2; HRS §190-4; am L 1981, c 16, §3; am L 2010, c 77, §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next